Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 4. Title, Creditors, and Good Faith Purchasers.

Sec. 45.02.401.
Passing of title; reservation for security; limited application of this section.

Each provision of this chapter with regard to the rights, obligations, and remedies of the seller, the buyer, purchasers, or other third parties applies irrespective of title to the goods except where the provision refers to the title. Insofar as situations are not covered by the other provisions of this chapter and matters concerning title become material, the following rules apply:

title to goods cannot pass under a contract for sale before their identification to the contract (AS

45.02.501

), and, unless otherwise explicitly agreed, the buyer acquires by their identification a special property as limited by the code; a retention or reservation by the seller of the title (property) in goods shipped or delivered to the buyer is limited in effect to a reservation of a security interest; subject to these provisions and to the provisions of AS 45.29, title to goods passes from the seller to the buyer in the manner and on the conditions explicitly agreed on by the parties;

unless otherwise explicitly agreed, title passes to the buyer at the time and place at which the seller completes performance with reference to the physical delivery of the goods, despite a reservation of a security interest and even though a document of title is to be delivered at a different time or place; in particular and despite a reservation of a security interest by the bill of lading,

if the contract requires or authorizes the seller to send the goods to the buyer but does not require the seller to deliver them at destination, title passes to the buyer at the time and place of shipment; but

if the contract requires delivery at destination, title passes on tender there;

unless otherwise explicitly agreed, where delivery is to be made without moving the goods,

if the seller is to deliver a tangible document of title, title passes at the time and place the seller delivers the document, and, if the seller is to deliver an electronic document of title, title passes when the seller delivers the document; or

if the goods are, at the time of contracting, already identified and no documents of title are to be delivered, title passes at the time and place of contracting;

a rejection or other refusal by the buyer to receive or retain the goods, whether or not justified, or a justified revocation of acceptance revests title to the goods in the seller; this revesting occurs by operation of law and is not a “sale.”

History.

(§ 2.401 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 13 ch 20 SLA 2002; am § 17 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in (3)(A) added “tangible” preceding “document of title” and substituted “document, and, if the seller is to deliver an electronic document of title, title passes when the seller delivers the document” for “documents”; in (3)(B), added “of title” following “no documents”; made stylistic changes.

Sec. 45.02.402.
Rights of seller’s creditors against sold goods.

Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this section, rights of unsecured creditors of the seller with respect to goods that have been identified to a contract for sale are subject to the buyer’s rights to recover the goods under AS

45.02.502

and

45.02.716

.

A creditor of the seller may treat a sale or an identification of goods to a contract for sale as void if as against the creditor a retention of possession by the seller is fraudulent under any rule of law of the state where the goods are located, except that retention of possession in good faith and current course of trade by a merchant seller for a commercially reasonable time after a sale or identification is not fraudulent.

Nothing in this chapter may be considered to impair the rights of creditors of the seller

under the provisions of AS 45.29; or

if identification to the contract or delivery is made not in current course of trade but in satisfaction of or as security for a pre-existing claim for money, security, or the like and is made under circumstances that under any rule of law of the state where the goods are located would, apart from this chapter, constitute the transaction of a fraudulent transfer or voidable preference.

History.

(§ 2.402 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS 45.29” was substituted for “AS 45.09” in accordance with § 35, ch. 113, SLA 2000.

Sec. 45.02.403.
Power to transfer; good faith purchase of goods; “entrusting.”

A purchaser of goods acquires all title that the transferor had or had power to transfer, except that a purchaser of a limited interest acquires rights only to the extent of the interest purchased. A person with voidable title has power to transfer a good title to a good faith purchaser for value. When goods have been delivered under a transaction of purchase, the purchaser has such power even though

the transferor was deceived as to the identity of the purchaser;

the delivery was in exchange for a check that was later dishonored;

it was agreed that the transaction was to be a “cash sale”; or

the delivery was procured through fraud punishable as larcenous under the criminal law.

An entrusting of possession of goods to a merchant who deals in goods of that kind gives the merchant power to transfer all rights of the entruster to a buyer in ordinary course of business.

“Entrusting” includes a delivery and an acquiescence in retention of possession regardless of a condition expressed between the parties to the delivery or acquiescence and regardless of whether the procurement of the entrusting or the possessor’s disposition of the goods is larcenous under the criminal law.

The rights of other purchasers of goods and of lien creditors are governed by AS 45.07 and AS 45.29.

History.

(§ 2.403 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 12 ch 35 SLA 1993)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS 45.29” was substituted for “AS 45.09” in accordance with § 35, ch. 113, SLA 2000.